Hawaii statutes.
§241-3 Imposition of tax on other banks,
building and loan associations, financial services loan companies, financial
corporations, small business investment companies, trust companies, mortgage
loan companies, financial holding companies, development companies, and
subsidiaries. Every bank, other than a national banking association, every
building and loan association, every financial services loan company, financial
corporation, small business investment company, trust company, mortgage loan
company, financial holding company, development company, and subsidiary located
or doing business in the State, shall annually pay a franchise tax measured as,
and at the rate, provided in section 241-4. [L Sp 1957, c 1, pt of §10(a); am L
1965, c 224, §6; Supp, §127-3; HRS §241-3; am L 1976, c 203, §3(2); am L 1982,
c 92, §3(2); am L 1989, c 266, §3; am L 1992, c 106, §13]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next